src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 маганлигимдан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимда [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигинг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингни [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингнинг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингга [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингдан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингда [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлиги [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигини [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигининг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигига [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигидан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигида [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимиз [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимизни [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимизнинг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимизга [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимиздан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигимизда [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингиз [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингизни [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингизнинг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингизга [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингиздан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганлигингизда [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликлари [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликларини [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликларининг [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликларига [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликларидан [^гқ]
SFX X 0 маганликларида [^гқ]
SFX X 0 моқда .
SFX X 0 моқдами .
SFX X 0 моқдадир .
SFX X 0 моқда-да .
SFX X 0 моқдадир-да .
SFX X 0 моқдамикан .
SFX X 0 моқда-ку .
SFX X 0 моқдаки .
SFX X 0 моқда-чи .
SFX X 0 моқдакими .
SFX X 0 моқдакидир .
SFX X 0 моқдаки-да .
SFX X 0 моқдакидир-да .
SFX X 0 моқдакимикан .
SFX X 0 моқдаки-ку .
SFX X 0 моқдакики .
SFX X 0 моқдаки-чи .
SFX X 0 моққа .
SFX X 0 моққами .
SFX X 0 моққадир .
SFX X 0 моққа-да .
SFX X 0 моққадир-да .
SFX X 0 моққамикан .
SFX X 0 моққа-ку .
SFX X 0 моққаки .
SFX X 0 моққа-чи .
SFX X 0 моқнинг .
SFX X 0 моқнингми .
SFX X 0 моқнингдир .
SFX X 0 моқнинг-да .
SFX X 0 моқнингдир-да .
SFX X 0 моқнингмикан .
SFX X 0 моқнинг-ку .
SFX X 0 моқнингки .
SFX X 0 моқнинг-чи .
SFX X 0 моқдан .
SFX X 0 моқданми .
SFX X 0 моқдандир .
SFX X 0 моқдан-да .
SFX X 0 моқдандир-да .
SFX X 0 моқданмикан .
SFX X 0 моқдан-ку .
SFX X 0 моқданки .
SFX X 0 моқдан-чи .
SFX X 0 моқни .
SFX X 0 моқними .
SFX X 0 моқнидир .
SFX X 0 моқни-да .
SFX X 0 моқнидир-да .
SFX X 0 моқнимикан .
SFX X 0 моқни-ку .
SFX X 0 моқники .
SFX X 0 моқни-чи .
SFX X 0 моққача .
SFX X 0 моққачами .
SFX X 0 моққачадир .
SFX X 0 моққача-да .
SFX X 0 моққачадир-да .
SFX X 0 моққачамикан .
SFX X 0 моққача-ку .
SFX X 0 моққачаки .
SFX X 0 моққача-чи .
SFX X 0 моққина .
SFX X 0 моқдаю .
SFX X 0 моқчию .
SFX X 0 моққаю .
SFX X 0 моқдану .
SFX X 0 моқнику .
SFX X 0 моқдек .
SFX X 0 моқ/ADVIJKLM .
SFX X а овчи/ABVIJKLM а
SFX X я ёвчи/ABVIJKLM я
SFX X 0 ловчи/ABVIJKLM у
SFX X 0 увчи/ABVIJKLM [^ауя]

SFX Y Y 79
SFX Y 0 ки .
SFX Y 0 -ку .
SFX Y 0 -да .
SFX Y 0 -ов .
SFX Y 0 ми .
SFX Y 0 микан .
SFX Y 0 да .
SFX Y 0 ман .
SFX Y 0 манки .
SFX Y 0 ман-ку .
SFX Y 0 ман-да .
SFX Y 0 ман-у .
SFX Y 0 ман-ов .
SFX Y 0 манми .
SFX Y 0 манмикан .
SFX Y 0 манда .
SFX Y 0 миз .
SFX Y 0 мизки .
SFX Y 0 миз-ку .
SFX Y 0 миз-да .
SFX Y 0 миз-у .
SFX Y 0 миз-ов .
SFX Y 0 мизми .
SFX Y 0 мизмикан .
SFX Y 0 мизда .
SFX Y 0 сан .
SFX Y 0 санки .
SFX Y 0 сан-ку .
SFX Y 0 сан-да .
SFX Y 0 сан-у .
SFX Y 0 сан-ов .
SFX Y 0 санми .
SFX Y 0 санмикан .
SFX Y 0 санда .
SFX Y 0 сиз .
SFX Y 0 сизки .
SFX Y 0 сиз-ку .
SFX Y 0 сиз-да .
SFX Y 0 сиз-у .
SFX Y 0 сиз-ов .
SFX Y 0 сизми .
SFX Y 0 сизмикан .
SFX Y 0 сизда .
SFX Y 0 санлар .
SFX Y 0 санларки .
SFX Y 0 санлар-ку .
SFX Y 0 санлар-да .
SFX Y 0 санлар-у .
SFX Y 0 санлар-ов .
SFX Y 0 санларми .
SFX Y 0 санлармикан .
SFX Y 0 санларда .
SFX Y 0 сизлар .
SFX Y 0 сизларки .
SFX Y 0 сизлар-ку .
SFX Y 0 сизлар-да .
SFX Y 0 сизлар-у .
SFX Y 0 сизлар-ов .
SFX Y 0 сизларми .
SFX Y 0 сизлармикан .
SFX Y 0 сизларда .
SFX Y 0 ди .
SFX Y 0 дики .
SFX Y 0 ди-ку .
SFX Y 0 ди-да .
SFX Y 0 ди-ю .
SFX Y 0 ди-ов .
SFX Y 0 дими .
SFX Y 0 димикан .
SFX Y 0 дида .
SFX Y 0 дилар .
SFX Y 0 диларки .
SFX Y 0 дилар-ку .
SFX Y 0 дилар-да .
SFX Y 0 дилар-у .
SFX Y 0 дилар-ов .
SFX Y 0 диларми .
SFX Y 0 дилармикан .
SFX Y 0 диларда .

SFX Z Y 70
SFX Z 0 ки .
SFX Z 0 -ку .
SFX Z 0 -да .
SFX Z 0 -ов .
SFX Z 0 ми .
SFX Z 0 да .
SFX Z 0 микан .
SFX Z 0 ман .
SFX Z 0 манки .
SFX Z 0 ман-ку .
SFX Z 0 ман-да .
SFX Z 0 ман-у .
SFX Z 0 ман-ов .
SFX Z 0 манми .
SFX Z 0 манда .
SFX Z 0 манмикан .
SFX Z 0 миз .
SFX Z 0 мизки .
SFX Z 0 миз-ку .
SFX Z 0 миз-да .
SFX Z 0 миз-у .
SFX Z 0 миз-ов .
SFX Z 0 мизми .
SFX Z 0 мизда .
SFX Z 0 мизмикан .
SFX Z 0 сан .
SFX Z 0 санки .
SFX Z 0 сан-ку .
SFX Z 0 сан-да .
SFX Z 0 сан-у .
SFX Z 0 сан-ов .
SFX Z 0 санми .
SFX Z 0 санда .
SFX Z 0 санмикан .
SFX Z 0 сиз .
SFX Z 0 сизки .
SFX Z 0 сиз-ку .
SFX Z 0 сиз-да .
SFX Z 0 сиз-у .
SFX Z 0 сиз-ов .
SFX Z 0 сизми .
SFX Z 0 сизда .
SFX Z 0 сизмикан .
SFX Z 0 санлар .
SFX Z 0 санларки .
SFX Z 0 санлар-ку .
SFX Z 0 санлар-да .
SFX Z 0 санлар-у .
SFX Z 0 санлар-ов .
SFX Z 0 санларми .
SFX Z 0 санларда .
SFX Z 0 санлармикан .
SFX Z 0 сизлар .
SFX Z 0 сизларки .
SFX Z 0 сизлар-ку .
SFX Z 0 сизлар-да .
SFX Z 0 сизлар-у .
SFX Z 0 сизлар-ов .
SFX Z 0 сизларми .
SFX Z 0 сизларда .
SFX Z 0 сизлармикан .
SFX Z 0 лар .
SFX Z 0 ларки .
SFX Z 0 лар-ку .
SFX Z 0 лар-да .
SFX Z 0 лар-у .
SFX Z 0 лар-ов .
SFX Z 0 ларми .
SFX Z 0 ларда .
SFX Z 0 лармикан .

SFX a Y 7
SFX a 0 ки .
SFX a 0 -ку .
SFX a 0 -да .
SFX a 0 -ов .
SFX a 0 да .
SFX a 0 ми .
SFX a 0 микан .

SFX b Y 96
SFX b 0 ман .
SFX b 0 манки .
SFX b 0 ман-ку .
SFX b 0 ман-да .
SFX b 0 ман-у .
SFX b 0 ман-ов .
SFX b 0 манда .
SFX b 0 манми .
SFX b 0 манмикан .
SFX b 0 мандир .
SFX b 0 мандир-да .
SFX b 0 ман-чи .
SFX b 0 миз .
SFX b 0 мизки .
SFX b 0 миз-ку .
SFX b 0 миз-да .
SFX b 0 миз-у .
SFX b 0 миз-ов .
SFX b 0 мизда .
SFX b 0 мизми .
SFX b 0 мизмикан .
SFX b 0 миздир .
SFX b 0 миздир-да .
SFX b 0 миз-чи .
SFX b 0 сан .
SFX b 0 санки .
SFX b 0 сан-ку .
SFX b 0 сан-да .
SFX b 0 сан-у .
SFX b 0 сан-ов .
SFX b 0 санда .
SFX b 0 санми .
SFX b 0 санмикан .
SFX b 0 сандир .
SFX b 0 сандир-да .
SFX b 0 сан-чи .
SFX b 0 сиз .
SFX b 0 сизки .
SFX b 0 сиз-ку .
SFX b 0 сиз-да .
SFX b 0 сиз-у .
SFX b 0 сиз-ов .
SFX b 0 сизда .
SFX b 0 сизми .
SFX b 0 сизмикан .
SFX b 0 сиздир .
SFX b 0 сиздир-да .
SFX b 0 сиз-чи .
SFX b 0 санлар .
SFX b 0 санларки .
SFX b 0 санлар-ку .
SFX b 0 санлар-да .
SFX b 0 санлар-у .
SFX b 0 санлар-ов .
SFX b 0 санларда .
SFX b 0 санларми .
SFX b 0 санлармикан .
SFX b 0 санлардир .
SFX b 0 санлардир-да .
SFX b 0 санлар-чи .
SFX b 0 сизлар .
SFX b 0 сизларки .
SFX b 0 сизлар-ку .
SFX b 0 сизлар-да .
SFX b 0 сизлар-у .
SFX b 0 сизлар-ов .
SFX b 0 сизларда .
SFX b 0 сизларми .
SFX b 0 сизлармикан .
SFX b 0 сизлардир .
SFX b 0 сизлардир-да .
SFX b 0 сизлар-чи .
SFX b 0 ди .
SFX b 0 дики .
SFX b 0 ди-ку .
SFX b 0 ди-да .
SFX b 0 ди-ю .
SFX b 0 ди-ов .
SFX b 0 дида .
SFX b 0 дими .
SFX b 0 димикан .
SFX b 0 дидир .
SFX b 0 дидир-да .
SFX b 0 ди-чи .
SFX b 0 дилар .
SFX b 0 диларки .
SFX b 0 дилар-ку .
SFX b 0 дилар-да .
SFX b 0 дилар-у .
SFX b 0 дилар-ов .
SFX b 0 диларда .
SFX b 0 диларми .
SFX b 0 дилармикан .
SFX b 0 дилардир .
SFX b 0 дилардир-да .
SFX b 0 дилар-чи .
