src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авиамоделлаштир/X
ағнаш/X
ажралтир/X
айёрлан/X
айнаттир/X
акала/X
аламлан/X
ализаринла/X
алпанг-талпангла/X
андазала/X
аралашил/X
арит/X
арчтир/X
астарлат/X
ахборотлаштирил/X
аял/X
бадхўрлаш/X
бақувватлаш/X
бардамлаш/X
бахиллан/X
бегоналаштир/X
бездир/X
беқарорлаштир/X
бердир/X
бетла/X
беюзлаш/X
биқин/X
билиқсит/X
бирлаштирил/X
бичтирил/X
боқиз/X
бопла/X
бостиртир/X
бошлан/X
бўғиш/X
бўзар/X
бўйсундир/X
була/X
бўлинтир/X
бўрдай/X
бўрлаттир/X
бўтал/X
бўшат/X
бўяш/X
вайсат/X
варангла/X
вентиляциялан/X
вишиллат/X
вошиллат/X
галла/X
гапиртир/X
гидрогенлан/X
гримлат/X
гўзаллаш/X
гупиллат/X
гусурла/X
ғамлат/X
ғижин/X
ғимирсила/X
ғичирла/X
ғужлат/X
даволат/X
даканглат/X
даражалаштир/X
дасталан/X
демагоглаш/X
дийдират/X
димиқтир/X
довдираш/X
дорила/X
дукурлат/X
дўндир/X
дурустла/X
егиз/X
ёдлаёл/X
ёйилинқира/X
ел/X
ёллан/X
ёмонлаштир/X
ёндиргиз/X
ёритил/X
етимлаш/X
етол/X
ёшлат/X
жадаллаш/X
жанғилла/X
жиғилла/X
жилдираш/X
жимирлат/X
жиҳозла/X
жоҳиллаш/X
жунжи/X
заифлаштирил/X
зарарлан/X
зериктир/X
зирилла/X
зориқавер/X
зўрлан/X
изғиртир/X
ийдиртир/X
илгарилан/X
илиқ/X
имла/X
индат/X
инқиллат/X
интилиш/X
иржайиш/X
искалан/X
итарил/X
иҳоталан/X
ишқа/X
ишонил/X
йиғилол/X
йирган/X
йўй/X
йўлиқиш/X
кавла/X
каллакла/X
капиталлаш/X
касирлат/X
кез/X
келтиргиз/X
кериш/X
кетказ/X
кечкирт/X
килкиллат/X
кирлаш/X
кишна/X
ковлаштир/X
компьютерлаштир/X
кооперацияла/X
кудунгла/X
куйла/X
кукулаш/X
кўмаклаш/X
кўп/X
куракла/X
куркилла/X
куткилаш/X
куюктир/X
қадайвер/X
қаздирил/X
қайнаттир/X
қақақла/X
қалбакилаштир/X
қамчилан/X
қарал/X
қарталаштир/X
қатнат/X
қашиш/X
қиздир/X
қийинлаштирил/X
қийратил/X
қилтилла/X
қирғоқлат/X
қисил/X
қитиқлаш/X
қияла/X
қоқ/X
қолол/X
қопин/X
қориштирил/X
қувала/X
қувониш/X
қуйдирил/X
қулдира/X
қулунлат/X
қўндоқла/X
қури/X
қурқура/X
қуршаш/X
қуч/X
лаблантир/X
лахталан/X
липиллат/X
лойқат/X
лўкиллаш/X
мадорсизлантирил/X
майдалаштирил/X
манманлаш/X
махсуслаштирил/X
маъра/X
механикалаш/X
мижиғлан/X
милтиллаш/X
минераллаш/X
моддийлаш/X
монополлаш/X
мувофиқлан/X
музлат/X
мўлжаллан/X
мункайтир/X
мусобақалаш/X
муштлаштир/X
нақшлат/X
натураллаштир/X
нет/X
ниллан/X
новқослан/X
нонушталан/X
ночорлан/X
нусхалан/X
обрўйсизлан/X
огоҳла/X
оғула/X
озайтирил/X
оқарин/X
оқсоқлан/X
олиштирил/X
оммавийлаш/X
оптималлаштирил/X
оромсизлантир/X
осмонла/X
оҳакла/X
очиртир/X
оширавер/X
паканалаш/X
папалаш/X
парчалан/X
патентлаштир/X
печанлаш/X
пиқирлаш/X
пирқилла/X
пич/X
пиширил/X
пойлан/X
пориллат/X
пролетарлаш/X
пурка/X
пўштпўштлаш/X
разиллаштир/X
расмийлаш/X
резала/X
розилаш/X
руҳсизлан/X
сайқаллан/X
салангла/X
сандират/X
санчиш/X
саросималан/X
саҳарла/X
сездирил/X
сенсира/X
серпа/X
сиғинтир/X
сийқала/X
сийраклатил/X
силаб-сийпала/X
силлиқла/X
сингдирил/X
сипқириш/X
сирқит/X
сихлат/X
соғайтир/X
соддалаштир/X
сопла/X
сочил/X
суваш/X
судлан/X
сўзлаттир/X
сўк/X
сулайтир/X
сўмла/X
сўраштир/X
суриниш/X
сўррай/X
суҳбатлашил/X
суянил/X
таёқлан/X
такаббурлан/X
тақа/X
тақиқлат/X
талаш/X
тамғалан/X
танғиллат/X
тансиқлан/X
таралиш/X
тариллат/X
тарсакила/X
тасирлат/X
тафтишла/X
ташал/X
ташнала/X
таърифлаш/X
тегиз/X
тезлатил/X
телбалан/X
тепалат/X
терга/X
терчила/X
тижорийлаштирил/X
тизимлаштирил/X
тиклан/X
тиқирла/X
тилишлан/X
тингла/X
тиниттир/X
тира/X
тириқтир/X
тирмалаш/X
тислантир/X
тиша/X
тожикила/X
тойилтир/X
томдир/X
топирла/X
торайтирил/X
тош/X
тугат/X
тўғна/X
туза/X
тўзиттир/X
туйдир/X
тўқил/X
тўқмоқлат/X
тўлғантир/X
тулла/X
тўнгла/X
тўпла/X
тўралаш/X
турлан/X
тўс/X
тутилинқира/X
туфлат/X
тушла/X
уват/X
ўгиртирил/X
узайтир/X
ўзгартир/X
узоқлан/X
уйдир/X
уйлантир/X
ўйнаттир/X
уқала/X
ўқрай/X
улгурт/X
улоқтирил/X
умидлантир/X
унаштириш/X
ўнғарил/X
ўпиртир/X
ўраттир/X
ўрил/X
ўрмакла/X
уртин/X
ўсмоқчила/X
ўтказил/X
ўтқизил/X
ўхчи/X
ўчинқира/X
учол/X
ушлан/X
уятсизлан/X
фаҳмла/X
формалинлан/X
хайр-хўшлаш/X
хаспўшлан/X
хезлат/X
хиралантир/X
хихла/X
хомсира/X
хоҳла/X
хўпла/X
хушбўйла/X
ҳадиксира/X
ҳайкаллаш/X
ҳаллосла/X
ҳансираш/X
ҳаяжонлан/X
ҳилпира/X
ҳовлиқиш/X
ҳоҳола/X
ҳўнгилла/X
ҳурпайтир/X
цистиллан/X
чайқалиш/X
чакиллат/X
чақмоқла/X
чалин/X
чамала/X
чанқаттир/X
чарақлат/X
чатиштирил/X
чекил/X
черттир/X
чиғилла/X
чизилла/X
чиқ/X
чиқиштир/X
чимчиш/X
чириллат/X
чирсиллат/X
чоғлан/X
чордевор/X
чуви/X
чуғурлат/X
чўкичла/X
чўқиш/X
чулдурат/X
чўнқайтир/X
чучит/X
шаблонлаштирил/X
шаклантир/X
шалоплат/X
шапилла/X
шартла/X
шериклаш/X
шиғрай/X
шилинтир/X
шимил/X
шипшипла/X
шифрлан/X
шовуллат/X
шохлан/X
шубҳалантир/X
шумшуклан/X
эгарлат/X
эзгилаттир/X
экспозицияла/X
эликиш/X
эмлат/X
эргаш/X
эс/X
этил/X
юбориш/X
югурт/X
юкун/X
юлқила/X
юпан/X
юрин/X
яганалан/X
якунлаштир/X
ялаттир/X
ялпоқлаш/X
янгилан/X
ярақлат/X
яроғлантир/X
яхлат/X
яширил/X
